Colorado, session 2026A, HB1164.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of personnel for
the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part XVI as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XVI
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(A) Department Administration
Personal Services 2,650,333 35,837 2,614,496a
(20.6 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 6,369,282 2,463,429 175,734b 3,730,119a
6,536,687 2,511,576 181,100b 3,844,011a
Short-term Disability 26,917 12,147 779b 13,991a
Paid Family Medical Leave
Insurance 172,080 78,088 5,010b 88,982a
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 3,823,975 1,735,281 111,331b 1,977,363a
Salary Survey 1,040,829 475,420 30,661b 534,748a
Step Pay 188,525 47,621 1,540b 139,364a
PERA Direct Distribution 749,086 340,842 21,956b 386,288a
Shift Differential 81,173 81,173a
Workers' Compensation 353,747 136,619 12,843b 204,285a
Operating Expenses 106,557 106,557
Legal Services 407,556 252,858 106,946b 47,752a
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 3,122,472 1,205,920 113,372b 1,803,180a
Vehicle Lease Payments 262,163 393b 261,770a
221,945 73b 221,872a
Leased Space 353,886 353,886a
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 4,015,796 2,739,205 38,409b 1,238,182a
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Annual Depreciation - Lease
Equivalent Payment 1,838,210 1,838,210
Payments to OIT 12,744,727 4,761,569 1,895,312b 6,087,846a
12,063,477 4,507,047 1,794,001b 5,762,429a
CORE Operations 62,696 24,213 2,276b 36,207a
38,370,010
37,815,947
a Of these amounts, it is estimated that $16,985,136 $16,733,713 shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds including, but not limited to, the State Archives and Records Cash
Fund created in Section 24-80-102 (10)(a), C.R.S., the Risk Management Fund created in Section 24-30-1510 (1)(a), C.R.S., the Self-Insured Property Fund created in Section
24-30-1510.5 (1)(a), C.R.S., the State Employee Workers' Compensation Account created in Section 24-30-1510.7 (1)(a), C.R.S., the Department of Personnel Revolving Fund created
in Section 24-30-1108 (1), C.R.S., the Motor Fleet Management Fund created in Section 24-30-1115 (1), C.R.S., the Statewide Financial Information Technology Systems Cash Fund
created in Section 24-30-209 (2)(a), C.R.S., and the Administrative Courts Cash Fund created in Section 24-30-1001 (3), C.R.S., and $2,614,496 shall be from statewide indirect cost
recoveries from the Department of Personnel or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from various sources of cash funds including, but not limited to, the Group Benefit Plans Reserve Fund created in Section 24-50-613 (1), C.R.S., the State
Archives and Records Cash Fund created in Section 24-80-102 (10)(a), C.R.S., the Risk Management Fund created in Section 24-30-1510 (1)(a), C.R.S., the Self-Insured Property Fund
created in Section 24-30-1510.5 (1)(a), C.R.S., the State Employee Workers' Compensation Account created in Section 24-30-1510.7 (1)(a), C.R.S., the Department of Personnel
Revolving Fund created in Section 24-30-1108 (1), C.R.S., the Supplier Database Cash Fund created in Section 24-102-202.5 (2)(a), C.R.S., and the Administrative Courts Cash Fund
created in Section 24-30-1001 (3), C.R.S.
(B) Statewide Special Purpose
(1) Colorado State Employees Assistance Program
Personal Services 1,449,239
(14.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 93,293
Indirect Cost Assessment 319,269
1,861,801 94,964a 1,766,837b
a This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from the Risk Management Fund created in Section 24-30-1510 (1)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(2) Office of the State Architect
Office of the State
Architect85 2,140,235 2,140,235
(13.0 FTE)
Statewide Planning
Services86 7,811 7,811
2,148,046
(3) Colorado Equity Office
Personal Services 677,493 677,493
(10.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 13,500 13,500
690,993
(4) Other Statewide Special Purpose
Test Facility Lease 119,842 119,842
Employment Security
Contract Payment 17,199 8,463 8,736a
Americans with Disabilities
Act Reasonable
Accommodation
Coordination 470,413 470,413
(1.0 FTE)
Public-Private Collaboration
Unit 316,153 316,153(I)b
(3.0 FTE)
State Procurement Equity
Program 605,175 605,175
(5.0 FTE)
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Office of Sustainability 400,000 400,000c
1,928,782
a This amount shall be from user fees from state agencies based on historical utilization.
b This amount shall be from the Unused State-owned Real Property Fund created in Section 24-82-102.5 (5)(a), C.R.S. The amount is shown for informational purposes as it is
continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 24-82-102.5 (5)(c)(I), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the State Agency Sustainability Revolving Fund created in Section 24-30-2304 (1), C.R.S.
44,999,632
44,445,569
(2) DIVISION OF HUMAN RESOURCES
(A) Human Resource Services
(1) State Agency Services
Personal Services 2,982,822
(29.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 104,597
Total Compensation and
Employee Engagement
Surveys 425,000
State Employee Tuition
Reimbursement 300,000
3,812,419 3,812,419
(2) Training Services
Training Services 675,109 675,109
(6.3 FTE)
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Labor Relations Services
Personal Services 2,002,969 2,002,969
(20.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 126,385 126,385
Union Stewards 50,000 50,000
2,179,354
(C) Employee Benefits Services
Personal Services 1,081,150 1,081,150a
(12.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 58,093 58,093a
Utilization Review 25,000 25,000a
House Bill 07-1335
Supplemental State
Contribution Fund 1,848,255 1,848,255(I)b
Indirect Cost Assessment 277,668 277,668a
3,290,166
a These amounts shall be from the Group Benefit Plans Reserve Fund created in Section 24-50-613 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Supplemental State Contribution Fund created in Section 24-50-609 (5), C.R.S. The amount is shown for informational purposes as it is continuously
appropriated pursuant to Section 24-50-609 (5), C.R.S.
(D) Risk Management Services
(1) Risk Management Program Administrative Cost
Personal Services 1,099,512 1,099,512a
(12.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 65,018 65,018a
Actuarial and Broker
Services 414,706 414,706a
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Risk Management
Information System 230,533 230,533a
Indirect Cost Assessment 211,163 211,163a
2,020,932
a These amounts shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds including, the Risk Management Fund created in Section 24-30-1510 (1)(a), C.R.S., the Self-Insured Property
Fund created in Section 24-30-1510.5 (1)(a), C.R.S., and the State Employee Workers' Compensation Account created in Section 24-30-1510.7 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(2) Liability
Liability Claims 12,678,152
Liability Legal Services 9,551,301
22,229,453 301,233(I)a 21,928,220(I)b
a This amount shall be from state agencies for the Risk Management Fund created in Section 24-30-1510 (1)(a), C.R.S. The amount is shown for informational purposes as it is
continuously appropriated for purposes other than the direct and indirect administrative costs of operating the risk management system pursuant to Section 24-30-1510 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from state agencies for the Risk Management Fund created in Section 24-30-1510 (1)(a), C.R.S. The amount is shown for informational purposes as it is
continuously appropriated for purposes other than the direct and indirect administrative costs of operating the risk management system pursuant to Section 24-30-1510 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(3) Property
Property Policies 19,856,591
Property Deductibles and
Payouts 21,790,649
41,647,240 41,647,240(I)a
a This amount shall be from the Self-Insured Property Fund created in Section 24-30-1510.5 (1)(a), C.R.S. The amount is shown for informational purposes as it is continuously
appropriated for purposes other than the direct and indirect administrative costs of operating the risk management system pursuant to Section 24-30-1510.5 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(4) Workers' Compensation
Workers' Compensation
Claims 30,222,640 2,654,695(I)a 27,567,945(I)b
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Workers' Compensation TPA
Fees and Loss Control 1,850,000 1,850,000b
Workers' Compensation
Excess Policy 1,562,367 1,562,367(I)b
Workers' Compensation
Legal Services 1,796,548 1,796,548b
35,431,555
a This amount shall be from the State Employee Workers' Compensation Account created in Section 24-30-1510.7 (1)(a), C.R.S., and is shown for informational purposes as it is
continuously appropriated for purposes other than the direct and indirect administrative costs of operating the risk management system pursuant to Section 24-30-1510.7 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from the State Employee Workers' Compensation Account created in Section 24-30-1510.7 (1)(a), C.R.S. Of these amounts, $29,130,312(I) is shown for
informational purposes as it is continuously appropriated for purposes other than the direct and indirect administrative costs of operating the risk management system pursuant to Section
24-30-1510.7 (1)(a), C.R.S.
111,286,228
(3) STATE PERSONNEL BOARD
Personal Services 664,571 664,571
(5.1 FTE)
Operating Expenses 23,374 23,374
Legal Services 2,224 2,224
690,169
(4) DIVISION OF CENTRAL SERVICES
(A) Administration
Personal Services 657,349
(5.2 FTE)
Operating Expenses 27,690
Indirect Cost Assessment 16,611
701,650 701,650a
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds including the Department of Personnel Revolving Fund created in Section 24-30-1108 (1), C.R.S. The amount is
from user fees from state agencies.
(B) Integrated Document Solutions
Personal Services 8,347,866 141,615a 8,206,251b
(102.6 FTE)
Operating Expenses 22,759,607 980,537a 21,779,070b
24,106,547 23,126,010b
Commercial Print Payments 1,733,260 1,733,260b
Print Equipment Lease
Purchase 547,243 547,243b
Scan Equipment Lease
Purchase 151,776 151,776b
Utilities 69,000 69,000b
Address Confidentiality
Program 1,033,813 892,139 141,674c
(8.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 589,670 589,670b
35,232,235
36,579,175
a These amounts shall be from the Department of Personnel Revolving Fund created in Section 24-30-1108 (1), C.R.S. The amounts are from user fees from non-state agencies.
b These amounts shall be from the Department of Personnel Revolving Fund created in Section 24-30-1108 (1), C.R.S. The amounts are from user fees from state agencies.
c This amount shall be from the Address Confidentiality Program Surcharge Fund created in Section 24-30-2114 (4)(a), C.R.S.
(C) Colorado State Archives
Personal Services 869,744 748,934 91,739a 29,071b
(13.1 FTE)
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Operating Expenses 448,885 422,885 26,000a
1,318,629
a These amounts shall be from the State Archives and Records Cash Fund created in Section 24-80-102 (10)(a), C.R.S. The amount is from user fees from non-state agencies.
b This amount shall be from the State Archives and Records Cash Fund created in Section 24-80-102 (10)(a), C.R.S. The amount is from user fees from state agencies.
37,252,514
38,599,454
(5) DIVISION OF ACCOUNTS AND CONTROL
(A) Financial Operations and Reporting
Personal Services 4,472,246 4,472,246
(38.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 149,823 149,823
4,622,069
(B) Procurement and Contracts
Personal Services 2,332,942 467,548 1,865,394a
(20.8 FTE)
Operating Expenses 42,089 42,089
2,375,031
a This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds including rebates received from the Procurement Card Program, institutions of higher education, reimbursements from the
National Association of State Procurement Officers Cooperative (NASPO), car rental, travel agency, and fuel rebates, or the Supplier Database Cash Fund created in Section 24-102-202.5
(2)(a), C.R.S.
(C) CORE Operations
Personal Services 2,515,038 2,515,038a
(22.3 FTE)
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Operating Expenses 59,590 59,590a
Payments for CORE and
Support Modules 6,159,278 6,159,278a
CORE Lease Purchase
Payments 1,269,676 1,269,676a
Indirect Cost Assessment 249,437 247,738a 1,699b
10,253,019
a Of these amounts, an estimated $6,848,171 shall be from the Supplier Database Cash Fund created in Section 24-102-202.5 (2)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $3,403,149 shall be
from the Statewide Financial Information Technology Systems Cash Fund created in Section 24-30-209 (2)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Statewide Financial Information Technology Systems Cash Fund created in Section 24-30-209 (2)(a), C.R.S. The amount is from user fees from
state agencies for CORE Operations.
17,250,119
(6) OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE COURTS
Personal Services 5,008,380
5,410,419
(47.4 FTE)
(52.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 195,699
257,587
Indirect Cost Assessment 189,364
5,393,443 252,990a 5,140,453b
5,857,370 5,604,380b
a This amount shall be from the Administrative Courts Cash Fund created in Section 24-30-1001 (3), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Administrative Courts Cash Fund created in Section 24-30-1001 (3), C.R.S. The amount is from user fees from state agencies.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(7) DIVISION OF CAPITAL ASSETS
(A) Administration
Personal Services 469,509
(3.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 18,310
Indirect Cost Assessment 8,650
496,469 496,469a
a This amount shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds including, the Department of Personnel Revolving Fund created in Section 24-30-1108 (1), C.R.S., and the Motor
Fleet Management Fund created in Section 24-30-1115 (1), C.R.S. The amount is from user fees from state agencies.
(B) Facilities Maintenance - Capitol Complex
Personal Services 4,964,180
(63.2 FTE)
Operating Expenses 4,051,925
Capitol Complex Repairs 56,520
Capitol Complex Security 826,076
Utilities 6,507,787
Indirect Cost Assessment 573,678
16,980,166 217,337 3,961,824a 12,801,005b
a This amount shall be from the Department of Personnel Revolving Fund created in Section 24-30-1108 (1), C.R.S. The amount is from non-state revenue.
b This amount shall be from the Department of Personnel Revolving Fund created in Section 24-30-1108 (1), C.R.S. The amount is from user fees from state agencies.
(C) Fleet Management Program and Motor Pool Services
Personal Services 1,580,827
(18.8 FTE)
Operating Expenses 2,017,835
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Motor Pool Vehicle Lease
and Operating Expenses 200,000
Fuel and Automotive
Supplies 28,009,597
Vehicle Replacement
Lease/Purchase87 36,137,733
34,390,208
Indirect Cost Assessment 178,986
68,124,978 68,124,978a
66,377,453 66,377,453a
a This amount shall be from the Motor Fleet Management Fund created in Section 24-30-1115 (1), C.R.S. The amount is from user fees from state agencies.
85,601,613
83,854,088
TOTALS PART XVI
(PERSONNEL) $302,473,718 $35,066,800 $27,286,866a $240,120,052b
$301,982,997 $34,860,425 $27,190,601a $239,931,971b
a Of this amount, $5,120,336 contains an (I) notation.
b Of this amount, $92,705,772 contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
85 Department of Personnel, Executive Director's Office, Statewide Special Purpose, Office of the State Architect, Office of the State Architect -- It is the General
Assembly's intent that $651,279 of this appropriation be used for the termination of private office leased space.
86 Department of Personnel, Executive Director's Office, Statewide Special Purpose, Office of the State Architect, Statewide Planning Services -- This
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
appropriation remains available until the close of the 2027-28 fiscal year.
87 Department of Personnel, Division of Capital Assets, Fleet Management Program and Motor Pool Services, Vehicle Replacement Lease/Purchase -- Pursuant
to Section 24-82-801 (1)(b) and (1)(c), C.R.S., the Department of Personnel is authorized to enter into a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of
participation for the approved vehicle replacements and additions for the 2025-26 state fiscal year. The financed purchase of an asset or certificate of
participation shall be for a period of up to ten years and shall not exceed the amount of $54,000,000.
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 2. Appropriation to the department of personnel for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. In Session Laws of Colorado 2024, section 2 of chapter 519, (HB
24-1430), amend Part XVI (4)(B) and the affected totals as the Part XVI affected totals are amended by Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 1 of chapter 466, (SB 25-103), as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART XVI
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
(4) DIVISION OF CENTRAL SERVICES
(B) Integrated Document Solutions
Personal Services 7,944,686 141,615a 7,803,071b
(102.6 FTE)
Operating Expenses 22,732,986 980,537a 21,752,449b
23,086,014 22,105,447b
Commercial Print Payments 1,733,260 1,733,260b
Print Equipment Lease
Purchase 547,243 547,243b
Scan Equipment Lease
Purchase 151,776 151,776b
Utilities 69,000 69,000b
Address Confidentiality
Program 739,029 597,355 141,674c
(7.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 453,776 453,776b
34,371,756
34,724,784
a These amounts shall be from the Department of Personnel Revolving Fund created in Section 24-30-1108 (1), C.R.S. The amounts are from user fees from non-state agencies.
b These amounts shall be from the Department of Personnel Revolving Fund created in Section 24-30-1108 (1), C.R.S. The amounts are from user fees from state agencies.
c This amount shall be from the Address Confidentiality Program Surcharge Fund created in Section 24-30-2114 (4)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
TOTALS PART XVI $291,463,814 $39,997,618 $30,593,322a $220,872,874b
(PERSONNEL) $291,816,842 $221,225,902b
a Of this amount, $2,148,113 contains an (I) notation.
b Of this amount, $81,165,058 contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1164

SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1164